Delaware, session 153, SB339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 2511, Title 16 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 2511. Optional form. The following form may be used to create an advance health-care directive: ADVANCE HEALTH-CARE DIRECTIVE HOW YOU CAN USE THIS FORM You can use this form if you wish to name someone to make health-care decisions for you in case you cannot make decisions for yourself. This is called giving the person a power of attorney for health care. This person is called your Agent. PART C: OPTIONAL SPECIAL POWERS AND GUIDANCE This part lets you give your Agent additional powers, and to provide more guidance about your wishes. You may mark or initial each choice. You also may leave any choice blank. 1. OPTIONAL SPECIAL POWERS My Agent can do the following things ONLY if I have marked or initialed them below: (____) Admit me as a voluntary patient to a facility for mental health treatment for up to _____ days (write in the number of days you want like 7, 14, 30 or another number) (this number may not exceed 72 hours, which is equal to 3 days). (If I do not mark or initial this choice, my Agent MAY NOT admit me as a voluntary patient to this type of facility.)